Utah statutes.
26-26-1.   "Institution" defined.

As used in this chapter, "institution" means any school or college of agriculture, veterinary medicine, medicine, pharmacy, dentistry or other educational, hospital or scientific establishment properly concerned with the investigation of or instruction concerning the structure or functions of living organisms, the cause, prevention, control or cure of diseases or abnormal condition of human beings or animals.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

